Wyoming statutes. Title 5 Courts
Article 1. In General [Repealed]

§§ 5-4-101 through 5-4-119.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This article, which derived from C.L. 1876, ch. 28, art. 10, § 2; C.L. 1876, ch. 71, Part 1, §§ 1 - 6, 192; Laws 1890, ch. 73, § 114; Laws 1895, ch. 72, § 1; Laws 1937, ch. 85, § 11; and Laws 1985, ch. 147, § 1, pertained to justices of the peace and constables generally.

Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2004.